California statutes. Civil Code
(7) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1785.15, limited to the right to request and receive a decoded written version of the file.

(8) Section
1785.16.

(9) Section 1785.18.

(c) An escrow agent rating service that acts as a reseller of credit information as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) shall comply with and be subject to Section 1785.22.

(d) An escrow agent rating service shall establish policies and procedures reasonably intended to safeguard from theft or misuse any personally identifiable information it obtains from an escrow agent.

(e) An escrow agent who suffers damages as a result of the failure of an escrow agent rating service to comply with subdivision (b), (c), or (d) may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to Section 1785.31 of the Civil Code.

(f) If an escrow agent rating
service is also a consumer credit reporting agency as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 1785.3, nothing in this section shall be construed to suggest that an escrow agent reporting service that is also a consumer credit reporting agency is not otherwise required to comply with other provisions of this title applicable to consumer credit reporting agencies.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a person, who was not otherwise legally authorized to perform escrow services prior to the effective date of this section, to legally perform escrow services.

(h) Nothing in this section is intended to alter the provisions of Section 17420 of the Financial Code, including the legal authority of an escrow agent to compensate an escrow agent rating service for a report prepared pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 380, Sec. 1.   (AB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 1785.28.6.)
-------------------------------------------

1785.28.6.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 105, Sec. 1.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.6, commencing with Section 1785.28.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Remedies [1785.30. - 1785.36.]

1785.30.

Upon notification of the results of a consumer credit reporting agency’s reinvestigation pursuant to Section 1785.16, a consumer may make a written demand on any person furnishing information to the consumer credit reporting agency to correct any information that the consumer believes to be inaccurate. The person upon whom the written demand is made shall acknowledge the demand within 30 days. The consumer may require the consumer credit reporting agency to indicate on any subsequent reports issued during the dispute that the item or items of information
are in dispute. If upon investigation the information is found to be inaccurate or incorrect, the consumer may require the consumer credit reporting agency to delete or correct the item or items of information within a reasonable time. If within 90 days the consumer credit reporting agency does not receive any information from the person requested to furnish the same or any communication relative to this information from this person, the consumer credit reporting agency shall delete the information from the report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1785.31.

(a) Any consumer who suffers damages as a result of a violation of this title by any person may bring an action in a court of appropriate jurisdiction against that person to recover the following:

(1) In the case of a negligent violation, actual damages, including court costs, loss of wages, attorney’s fees and, when applicable, pain and suffering.

(2) In the case of a willful violation:

(A) Actual damages as set forth in paragraph (1) above:

(B) Punitive damages of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation as the court deems proper;

(C) Any other relief that the court deems proper.

(3) In the case of liability of a natural person for obtaining a consumer credit report under false pretenses or knowingly without a permissible purpose, an award of actual damages pursuant to paragraph (1) or subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) shall be in an amount of not less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(b) Injunctive relief shall be available to any consumer aggrieved by a violation or a threatened violation of
this title whether or not the consumer seeks any other remedy under this section.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any person who willfully violates any requirement imposed under this title may be liable for punitive damages in the case of a class action, in an amount that the court may allow. In determining the amount of award in any class action, the court shall consider among relevant factors the amount of any actual damages awarded, the frequency of the violations, the resources of the violator and the number of persons adversely affected.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (e), the prevailing plaintiffs in any action commenced under this section shall be entitled to recover court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees. 

(e) If a plaintiff brings an action pursuant to this section against
a debt collector, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1788.2, and the basis for the action is related to the collection of a debt, whether issues relating to the debt collection are raised in the same or another proceeding, the debt collector shall be entitled to recover reasonable attorney’s fees upon a finding by the court that the action was not brought in good faith.

(f) If a plaintiff only seeks and obtains injunctive relief to compel compliance with this title, court costs and attorney’s fees shall be awarded pursuant to Section 1021.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(g) Nothing in this section is intended to affect remedies available under Section 128.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 836, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1785.32.

Except as provided in Section 1785.31, no consumer may bring any action or proceeding in the nature of defamation, invasion of privacy or negligence with respect to the reporting of information against any consumer reporting agency, any user of information, or any person who furnishes information to a consumer reporting agency, based on information disclosed pursuant to Section 1785.10, 1785.15 or 1785.20 of this title, except as to false information furnished with malice or willful intent to injure such consumer.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1785.31 by Stats. 1976, Ch. 666.)
-------------------------------------------

1785.33.

An action to enforce any liability created under this chapter may be brought in any appropriate court of competent jurisdiction within two years from the date the plaintiff knew of, or should have known of, the violation of this title, but not more than seven years from the earliest date on which liability could have arisen, except that where a defendant has materially and willfully misrepresented any information required under this chapter to be disclosed to a consumer and the information so misrepresented is material to the establishment of the
defendant’s liability to the consumer under this chapter, the action may be brought at any time within two years after the discovery by the consumer of the misrepresentation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 768, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.   Operative July 1, 1998, by Sec. 7 of Ch. 768.)
-------------------------------------------

1785.34.

(a) Any consumer credit reporting agency or user of information against whom an action brought pursuant to Section 1681n or 1681o of Title 15 of the United States Code is pending shall not be subject to suit for the same act or omission under Section 1785.31.

(b) The entry of a final judgment against a consumer credit reporting agency or user of information in an action brought pursuant to the provisions of Section 1681n or 1681o of Title 15 of the United States Code shall be a bar to the maintenance of any action based on the same act or omission which might be brought under this
chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1785.33 by Stats. 1976, Ch. 666.)
-------------------------------------------

1785.35.

This title does not apply to any consumer credit report that by its terms is limited to disclosures from public records relating to land and land titles and does not apply to any person whose records and files are maintained for the primary purpose of reporting those portions of the public records that impart constructive notice under the law of matters relating to land and land titles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 836, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1785.36.

Any waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 815, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.61. COMMERCIAL CREDIT REPORTS [1785.41. - 1785.44.]

1785.41.

Consumer credit reporting is subject to the regulations of the Consumer Credit Reporting Agencies Act. Commercial credit reports, which differ significantly, are not subject to that act. The circumstances, business practices, and reports themselves differ sufficiently to make it impractical to include commercial credit reports under the Consumer Credit Reporting Agencies Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 101, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1785.42.

(a) “Commercial credit report” means any report provided to a commercial enterprise for a legitimate business purpose, relating to the financial status or payment habits of a commercial enterprise which is the subject of the report. It does not include a report subject to Title 1.6 (commencing with Section 1785.1), Title 1.6A (commencing with Section 1786), or a report prepared for commercial insurance underwriting, claims, or auditing purposes.

The term does not include (1) any report
 containing information related to transactions or experiences between the subject and the person making the report; (2) any authorization or approval of a specific extension of credit directly or indirectly by the issuer of a credit card or similar device; or (3) any report in which a person who has been requested by a third party to make a specific extension of credit directly or indirectly to the subject conveys its decision with respect to that request.

(b) “Commercial credit reporting agency” means any person who, for monetary fees, dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, provides commercial credit reports to third parties.

(c) “Subject” means the commercial enterprise about which a commercial credit report has been compiled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 285, Sec. 9.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1785.43.

(a) Commercial credit reporting agencies may protect the identity of sources of information to be used in commercial credit reports.

(b) Upon the request of a representative of the subject of a report, the commercial credit reporting agency shall provide one printed copy of the subject’s commercial credit report in a format routinely made available to third parties, at a cost no greater than the cost usually charged to third parties.

(c) In the event that the subject of a commercial credit report believes the report contains an inaccurate statement of fact, a representative of the subject of the report may, within 30 days of receipt of the report pursuant to subdivision (b), file with the commercial credit reporting agency a written summary statement of not more than 50 words identifying the particular statement of fact that is disputed, and indicating the nature of the disagreement with the statement in the report. Within 30 days of receipt of a subject’s summary statement of disagreement, the commercial credit reporting agency shall either delete the disputed item of information from the report, or include in the report an indication that the subject’s summary statement of disagreement will be provided upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 101, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1785.44.

Any waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 815, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.6A. INVESTIGATIVE CONSUMER REPORTING AGENCIES [1786. - 1786.60.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1786. - 1786.2.]

1786.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) Investigative consumer reporting agencies have assumed a vital role in collecting, assembling, evaluating, compiling, reporting, transmitting, transferring, or communicating information on consumers for employment and insurance purposes, and for purposes relating to the hiring of dwelling units, subpoenas and court orders, licensure, and other lawful purposes.

(b) There is a need to
insure that investigative consumer reporting agencies exercise their grave responsibilities with fairness, impartiality, and a respect for the consumer’s right to privacy.

(c) The crime of identity theft in this new computer era has exploded to become the fastest growing white collar crime in America.

(d) The unique nature of this crime means it can often go undetected for years without the victim being aware his identity has been misused.

(e) Because notice of identity theft is critical before the victim can take steps to stop and prosecute this crime, consumers are best protected if they are automatically given copies of any investigative consumer reports made on them.

(f) It is the purpose of this title to require that investigative consumer
reporting agencies adopt reasonable procedures for meeting the needs of commerce for employment, insurance information, and information relating to the hiring of dwelling units in a manner which is fair and equitable to the consumer, with regard to the confidentiality, accuracy, relevancy, and proper utilization of the information in accordance with the requirements of this title.

(g) The Legislature hereby intends to regulate investigative consumer reporting agencies pursuant to this title in a manner which will best protect the interests of the people of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 354, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.1.

This title may be referred to as the Investigative Consumer Reporting Agencies Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1272.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.2.

The following terms as used in this title have the meaning expressed in this section:

(a) The term “person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, trust, estate, cooperative, association, government or governmental subdivision or agency, or other entity. The term “person” as used in this title shall not be construed to
require duplicative reporting by any individual, corporation, trust, estate, cooperative, association, government, or governmental subdivision or agency, or other entity involved in the same transaction.

(b) The term “consumer” means a natural individual who has made application to a person for employment purposes, for insurance for personal, family, or household purposes, or the hiring of a dwelling unit, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1940.

(c) The term “investigative consumer report” means a consumer report in which information on a consumer’s character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of living is obtained through any means. The term does not include a consumer report or other compilation of information that is limited to specific factual information relating to a consumer’s credit record or manner of obtaining credit obtained directly from a
creditor of the consumer or from a consumer reporting agency when that information was obtained directly from a potential or existing creditor of the consumer or from the consumer. Notwithstanding the foregoing, for transactions between investigative consumer reporting agencies and insurance institutions, agents, or insurance-support organizations subject to Article 6.6 (commencing with Section 791) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code, the term “investigative consumer report” shall have the meaning set forth in Section 791.02 of the Insurance Code.

(d) The term “investigative consumer reporting agency” means any person who, for monetary fees or dues, engages in whole or in part in the practice of collecting, assembling, evaluating, compiling, reporting, transmitting, transferring, or communicating information concerning consumers for the purposes of furnishing investigative consumer reports to third parties, but does not
include any governmental agency whose records are maintained primarily for traffic safety, law enforcement, or licensing purposes, or any licensed insurance agent, insurance broker, or solicitor, insurer, or life insurance agent.

(e) The term “file,” when used in connection with information on any consumer, means all of the information on that consumer recorded and retained by an investigative consumer reporting agency regardless of how the information is stored.

(f) The term “employment purposes,” when used in connection with an investigative consumer report, means a report used for the purpose of evaluating a consumer for employment, promotion, reassignment, or retention as an employee.

(g) The term “medical information” means information on a person’s medical history or condition obtained directly or indirectly
from a licensed physician, medical practitioner, hospital, clinic, or other medical or medically related facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 444, Sec. 6.   (SB 138)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Obligations of Investigative Consumer Reporting Agencies [1786.10. - 1786.40.]

1786.10.

(a) Every investigative consumer reporting agency shall, upon request and proper identification of any consumer, allow the consumer to visually inspect all files maintained regarding the consumer at the time of the request.

(b) (1) All items of information shall be available for inspection, except that the sources of information, other than public records and records from databases available for sale, acquired solely for use in preparing an
investigative consumer report and actually used for no other purpose need not be disclosed. However, if an action is brought under this title, those sources shall be available to the consumer under appropriate discovery procedures in the court in which the action is brought.

(2) This title shall not be interpreted to mean that investigative consumer reporting agencies are required to divulge to consumers the sources of investigative consumer reports, except in appropriate discovery procedures as outlined in this title.

(c) The investigative consumer reporting agency shall also identify the recipients of any investigative consumer report on the consumer that the investigative consumer reporting agency has furnished for either of the following purposes:

(1) For employment or insurance purposes within the three-year
period preceding the request.

(2) For any other purpose within the three-year period preceding the request.

(d) The identification of a recipient under subdivision (c) shall include the name of the recipient or, if applicable, the trade name (written in full) under which the recipient conducts business and, upon request of the consumer, the address and telephone number of the recipient.

(e) The investigative consumer reporting agency shall also disclose the dates, original payees, and amounts of any checks or charges upon which is based any adverse characterization of the consumer, included in the file at the time of the disclosure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.11.

Every investigative consumer reporting agency that provides an investigative consumer report to a person other than the consumer shall make a copy of that report available, upon request and proper identification, to the consumer for at least two years after the date that the report is provided to the other person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1029, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.12.

An investigative consumer reporting agency shall only furnish an investigative consumer report under the following circumstances:

(a) In response to the order of a court having jurisdiction to issue the order.

(b) In compliance with a lawful subpoena issued by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(c) In accordance with the written instructions of the consumer to whom
it relates.

(d) To a person that it has reason to believe:

(1) Intends to use the information for employment purposes; or

(2) Intends to use the information serving as a factor in determining a consumer’s eligibility for insurance or the rate for any insurance; or

(3) Intends to use the information in connection with a determination of the consumer’s eligibility for a license or other benefit granted by a governmental instrumentality required by law to consider the applicant’s financial responsibility or status; or

(4) Intends to use the information in connection with an order of a court of competent jurisdiction to provide support where the imposition or enforcement of the order involves
the consumer; or

(5) Intends to use the information in connection with the hiring of a dwelling unit, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1940.

(e) An investigative consumer reporting agency shall not prepare or furnish an investigative consumer report to a person described in subdivision (d) unless the agency has received the certification under paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1786.16 from the person requesting the report.

(f) An investigative consumer reporting agency shall not furnish an investigative consumer report to a person described in subdivision (d) if that report contains medical information about a consumer, unless the consumer consents to the furnishing of the report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 988, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.14.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1786.12 an investigative consumer reporting agency may furnish to a governmental agency a consumer’s name, address, former address, places of employment, or former places of employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1272.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.16.

(a) Any person described in subdivision (d) of Section 1786.12 shall not procure or cause to be prepared an investigative consumer report unless the following applicable conditions are met:

(1) If an investigative consumer report is sought in connection with the underwriting of insurance, it shall be clearly and accurately disclosed in
writing at the time the application form, medical form, binder, or similar document is signed by the consumer that an investigative consumer report regarding the consumer’s character, general reputation, personal characteristics, and mode of living may be made. If no signed application form, medical form, binder, or similar document is involved in the underwriting transaction, the disclosure shall be made to the consumer in writing and mailed or otherwise delivered to the consumer not later than three days after the report was first requested. The disclosure shall include the name and address of any investigative consumer reporting agency conducting an investigation, plus the nature and scope of the investigation requested, and a summary of the provisions of Section 1786.22.

(2) If, at any time, an investigative consumer report is sought for employment purposes other than suspicion of wrongdoing or misconduct by the subject of the
investigation, the person seeking the investigative consumer report may procure the report, or cause the report to be made, only if all of the following apply:

(A) The person procuring or causing the report to be made has a permissible purpose, as defined in Section 1786.12.

(B) The person procuring or causing the report to be made provides a clear and conspicuous disclosure in writing to the consumer at any time before the report is procured or caused to be made in a document that consists solely of the disclosure, that:

(i) An investigative consumer report may be obtained.

(ii) The permissible purpose of the report is identified.

(iii) The disclosure may include information on the
consumer’s character, general reputation, personal characteristics, and mode of living.

(iv) Identifies the name, address, and telephone number of the investigative consumer reporting agency conducting the investigation.

(v) Notifies the consumer in writing of the nature and scope of the investigation requested, including a summary of the provisions of Section 1786.22.

(vi) Notifies the consumer of the Internet Web site address of the investigative consumer reporting agency identified in clause (iv), or, if the agency has no Internet Web site address, the telephone number of the agency, where the consumer may find information about the investigative reporting agency’s privacy practices, including whether the consumer’s personal information will be sent outside the United States or its territories and information that
complies with subdivision (d) of Section 1786.20. This clause shall become operative on January 1, 2012.

(C) The consumer has authorized in writing the procurement of the report.

(3) If an investigative consumer report is sought in connection with the hiring of a dwelling unit, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1940, the person procuring or causing the request to be made shall, not later than three days after the date on which the report was first requested, notify the consumer in writing that an investigative consumer report will be made regarding the consumer’s character, general reputation, personal characteristics, and mode of living. The notification shall also include the name and address of the investigative consumer reporting agency that will prepare the report and a summary of the provisions of Section 1786.22.

(4) The person procuring or causing the request to be made shall certify to the investigative consumer reporting agency that the person has made the applicable disclosures to the consumer required by this subdivision and that the person will comply with subdivision (b).

(5) The person procuring the report or causing it to be prepared agrees to provide a copy of the report to the subject of the investigation, as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) Any person described in subdivision (d) of Section 1786.12 who requests an investigative consumer report, in accordance with subdivision (a) regarding that consumer, shall do the following:

(1) Provide the consumer a means by which the consumer may indicate on a written form, by means of a box to check, that the consumer wishes to receive a copy of any report that
is prepared. If the consumer wishes to receive a copy of the report, the recipient of the report shall send a copy of the report to the consumer within three business days of the date that the report is provided to the recipient, who may contract with any other entity to send a copy to the consumer. The notice to request the report may be contained on either the disclosure form, as required by subdivision (a), or a separate consent form. The copy of the report shall contain the name, address, and telephone number of the person who issued the report and how to contact them.

(2) Comply with Section 1786.40, if the taking of adverse action is a consideration.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) do not apply to an investigative consumer report procured or caused to be prepared by an employer, if the report is sought for employment purposes due to suspicion held by an employer of wrongdoing
or misconduct by the subject of the investigation.

(d) Those persons described in subdivision (d) of Section 1786.12 constitute the sole and exclusive class of persons who may cause an investigative consumer report to be prepared.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 481, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.18.

(a) Except as authorized under subdivision (b), an investigative consumer reporting agency may not make or furnish any investigative consumer report containing any of the following items of information:

(1) Bankruptcies that, from the date of the order for relief, antedate the report by more than 10 years.

(2) Suits that, from the date of filing, and satisfied judgments that, from the date of entry, antedate the report by more than seven years.

(3) Unsatisfied judgments that, from the date of entry, antedate the report by more than seven years.

(4) Unlawful detainer actions where the defendant was the prevailing party or where the action is resolved by settlement agreement.

(5) Paid tax liens that, from the date of payment, antedate the report by more than seven years.

(6) Accounts placed for collection or charged to profit and loss that antedate the report by more than seven years.

(7) Records of arrest, indictment, information, misdemeanor complaint, or conviction of a crime that, from the date of disposition, release, or parole, antedate the report by more than seven years. These items of information shall no longer be reported if at any time it is learned that, in the case of a conviction, a full pardon
 has been granted or, in the case of an arrest, indictment, information, or misdemeanor complaint, a conviction did not result; except that records of arrest, indictment, information, or misdemeanor complaints may be reported pending pronouncement of judgment on the particular subject matter of those records.

(8) Any other adverse information that antedates the report by more than seven years.

(9) Medical debt, as defined in Section 1785.3.

(b) The provisions of subdivision (a) are not applicable in either of the following circumstances:

(1) If the investigative consumer report is to be used in the underwriting of life insurance involving, or that may reasonably be
 expected to involve, an amount of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or more.

(2) If the investigative consumer report is to be used by an employer who is explicitly required by a governmental regulatory agency to check for records that are prohibited by subdivision (a) when the employer is reviewing a consumer’s qualification for employment.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in Section 1786.28, an investigative consumer reporting agency shall not furnish an investigative consumer report that includes information that is a matter of public record and that relates to an arrest, indictment, conviction, civil judicial action, tax lien, or outstanding judgment, unless the agency has verified the accuracy of the information during the 30-day period ending on the date on
 which the report is furnished.

(d) An investigative consumer reporting agency shall not prepare or furnish an investigative consumer report on a consumer that contains information that is adverse to the interest of the consumer and that is obtained through a personal interview with a neighbor, friend, or associate of the consumer or with another person with whom the consumer is acquainted or who has knowledge of the item of information, unless either (1) the investigative consumer reporting agency has followed reasonable procedures to obtain confirmation of the information, from an additional source that has independent and direct knowledge of the information, or (2) the person interviewed is the best possible source of the information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 520, Sec. 5.   (SB 1061)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.20.

(a) An investigative consumer reporting agency shall maintain reasonable procedures designed to avoid violations of Section 1786.18 and to limit furnishing of investigative consumer reports for the purposes listed under Section 1786.12. These procedures shall require that prospective users of the information identify themselves, certify the purposes for which the information is sought and that the
information will be used for no other purposes, and make the certifications described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1786.16. From the effective date of this title, the investigative consumer reporting agency shall keep a record of the purposes for which information is sought, as stated by the user. The investigative consumer reporting agency may assume that the purpose for which a user seeks information remains the same as that which a user has previously stated. The investigative consumer reporting agency shall inform the user that the user is obligated to notify the agency of any change in the purpose for which information will be used. An investigative consumer reporting agency shall make a reasonable effort to verify the identity of a new prospective user and the uses certified by the prospective user prior to furnishing the user any investigative consumer reports. An investigative consumer reporting agency may not furnish an investigative consumer report to a person unless it has a
written agreement that the investigative consumer reports will be used by that person only for purposes listed in Section 1786.12.

(b) Whenever an investigative consumer reporting agency prepares an investigative consumer report, it shall follow reasonable procedures to assure maximum possible accuracy of the information concerning the individual about whom the report relates. An investigative consumer reporting agency shall retain the investigative consumer report for two years after the report is provided.

(c) An investigative consumer reporting agency may not make an inquiry for the purpose of preparing an investigative consumer report on a consumer for employment purposes if the making of the inquiry by an employer or prospective employer of the consumer would violate applicable federal or state equal employment opportunity law or regulation.

(d) (1) An investigative consumer reporting agency doing business in this state shall conspicuously post, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 22577 of the Business and Professions Code, on its primary Internet Web site information describing its privacy practices with respect to its preparation and processing of investigative consumer reports. If the investigative consumer reporting agency does not have an Internet Web site, it shall, upon request, mail a written copy of the privacy statement to consumers. The privacy statement shall conspicuously include, but not be limited to, both of the following:

(A) A statement entitled “Personal Information Disclosure: United States or Overseas,” that indicates whether the personal information will be transferred to third parties outside the United States or its territories.

(B) A separate section that includes the name, mailing address, e-mail address, and telephone number of the investigative consumer reporting agency representatives who can assist a consumer with additional information regarding the investigative consumer reporting agency’s privacy practices or policies in the event of a compromise of his or her information.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “third party” shall include, but not be limited to, a contractor, foreign affiliate, wholly owned entity, or an employee of the investigative consumer reporting agency.

(e) An investigative consumer reporting agency shall be liable to a consumer who is the subject of a report if the consumer is harmed by any unauthorized access of the consumer’s personally identifiable information, act, or omission that occurs outside the United
States or its territories as a result of the investigative consumer reporting agency negligently preparing or processing an investigative consumer report, or portion thereof, outside of the United States or its territories. Liability shall be in an amount equal to the sum of (1) any actual damages sustained by the consumer as a result of the unauthorized access, and (2) in the case of any successful action to enforce any liability under this section, the costs of the action together with reasonable attorney’s fees, as determined by the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 481, Sec. 2.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.22.

(a) An investigative consumer reporting agency shall supply files and information required under Section 1786.10 during normal business hours and on reasonable notice.

(b) Files maintained on a consumer shall be made available for the consumer’s visual inspection, as follows:

(1) In person, if he appears in person and furnishes proper identification. A copy of his file shall also be available to the consumer for a fee not to exceed the actual costs of duplication services provided.

(2) By certified mail, if he makes a written request, with proper identification, for copies to be sent to a specified addressee. Investigative consumer reporting agencies complying with requests for certified mailings under this section shall not be liable for disclosures to third parties caused by mishandling of mail after such mailings leave the investigative consumer reporting agencies.

(3) A summary of all information contained in files on a consumer and required to be provided by Section 1786.10 shall be provided by telephone, if the consumer has made a written request, with proper identification for telephone disclosure, and the toll charge, if any, for the telephone call is prepaid by or charged directly to the consumer.

(c) The term “proper identification” as used in subdivision (b) shall mean that information
generally deemed sufficient to identify a person. Such information includes documents such as a valid driver’s license, social security account number, military identification card, and credit cards. Only if the consumer is unable to reasonably identify himself with the information described above, may an investigative consumer reporting agency require additional information concerning the consumer’s employment and personal or family history in order to verify his identity.

(d) The investigative consumer reporting agency shall provide trained personnel to explain to the consumer any information furnished him pursuant to Section 1786.10.

(e) The investigative consumer reporting agency shall provide a written explanation of any coded information contained in files maintained on a consumer. This written explanation shall be distributed whenever a file is provided to a consumer for
visual inspection as required under Section 1786.22.

(f) The consumer shall be permitted to be accompanied by one other person of his choosing, who shall furnish reasonable identification. An investigative consumer reporting agency may require the consumer to furnish a written statement granting permission to the consumer reporting agency to discuss the consumer’s file in such person’s presence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 666.)